Nebraska, session 109, LB891.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB891 LB891
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-1908, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-1908 (1) Sections 71-1908 to 71-1923.03 and sections 4 and 5 of
this act shall be known and may be cited as the Child Care Licensing Act.
(2) The Legislature finds that there is a present and growing need
for quality child care programs and facilities. There is a need to
establish and maintain licensure of persons providing such programs to
ensure that such persons are competent and are using safe and adequate
facilities. The Legislature further finds and declares that the
development and supervision of programs are a matter of statewide concern
and should be dealt with uniformly on the state and local levels. There
is a need for cooperation among the various state and local agencies
which impose standards on licensees, and there should be one agency which
coordinates the enforcement of such standards and informs the Legislature
about cooperation among the various agencies.
Sec. 2. Section 71-1912, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-1912 (1) Before issuance of a license, the department shall
investigate or cause an investigation to be made, when it deems
necessary, to determine if the applicant or person in charge of the
program meets or is capable of meeting the physical well-being, safety,
and protection standards and the other rules and regulations of the
department adopted and promulgated under the Child Care Licensing Act.
The department may investigate the character of applicants and licensees,
any member of the applicant's or licensee's household, and the staff and
employees of programs. The department may at any time inspect or cause an
inspection to be made of any place where a program is operating to
determine if such program is being properly conducted.
(2) All inspections by the department shall be unannounced except
for initial licensure visits and consultation visits. Initial licensure
visits are announced visits necessary for a provisional license to be
-2-

LB891 LB891
2026 2026
issued to a family child care home I, family child care home II, child
care center, or school-age-only or preschool program. Consultation visits
are announced visits made at the request of a licensee for the purpose of
consulting with a department specialist on ways of improving the program.
(3) An unannounced inspection of any place where a program is
operating shall be conducted by the department or the city, village, or
county pursuant to subsection (2) of section 71-1914 at least annually
for a program licensed to provide child care for fewer than thirty
children and at least twice every year for a program licensed to provide
child care for thirty or more children. At each unannounced inspection,
the inspector shall request from the licensee, and verify, current proof
of required liability insurance. If the licensee is unable to provide
current proof of liability insurance or has let the required coverage
lapse, the department shall notify the licensee that proof of insurance
shall be provided to the department within three business days. If such
proof of insurance is not provided to the department within three
business days, the licensee's license shall be suspended. Licensure shall
be restored upon the department's receipt and verification of current
proof of the required liability insurance as provided in section
71-1911.03.
(4) Whenever an inspection is made, the findings shall be recorded
in a report designated by the department. The public shall have access to
the results of these inspections upon a written or oral request to the
department. The request must include the name and address of the program.
Additional unannounced inspections shall be performed as often as is
necessary for the efficient and effective enforcement of the Child Care
Licensing Act.
(5)(a) A person applying for a license as a child care provider or a
licensed child care provider under the Child Care Licensing Act shall
submit a request for a national criminal history record information check
for each child care staff member, including a prospective child care
-3-

LB891 LB891
2026 2026
staff member of the child care provider, at the applicant's or licensee's
expense, as set forth in this section.
(b)(i) (b) A prospective child care staff member shall submit to a
national criminal history record information check (A) (i) prior to
employment, except as otherwise permitted under 45 C.F.R. 98.43, as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2019, or (B) (ii) prior to residing in a
family child care home.
(ii) Pursuant to 45 C.F.R. 98.43(d)(4), the department shall
authorize a prospective child care staff member to begin work for a child
care provider for purposes of employment in child care, or for a staffing
agency or substitute child care staff pool operator, for the purposes of
employment in child care as a substitute child care staff member, after
receiving qualifying results for either the national criminal history
record information check as described in subdivision (5)(d) of this
section or in subdivision (5)(e)(ii)(A) of this section in the state
where the prospective staff member resides. Pending completion of all
background check components, the staff member shall be supervised at all
times by an individual who received a qualifying result on a background
check described in subsection (5) of this section within the past five
years.
(c)(i) (c) The department shall provide documentation of national
criminal history record information checks which proves eligibility for
employment. Such documentation shall be made available to each child care
staff member or prospective child care staff member by the applicant or
licensee for at least one hundred eighty days after the last day of
employment or date the documentation was provided by the department,
whichever is later.
(ii) Pursuant to 45 C.F.R. 98.43(d)(3), a child care provider,
staffing agency, or substitute child care staff pool operator shall not
be required to submit a request for a national criminal history record
information check for a child care staff member or prospective child care
-4-

LB891 LB891
2026 2026
staff member if:
(A) The child care staff member or prospective child care staff
member received qualifying results from a background check described in
subdivisions (5)(d) and (5)(e) of this section:
(I) Within five years before the latest date on which such a
submission may be made; and
(II) While employed, or seeking employment, in child care within the
state;
(B) The department provided to the first child care provider,
staffing agency, or substitute child care staffing pool operator a
qualifying background check result for the child care staff member or
prospective child care staff member; and
(C) The child care staff member or prospective child care staff
member is employed in child care within the state, or has been separated
from employment in child care within the state for a period of not more
than one hundred eighty consecutive days.
(d) A child care staff member shall be required to undergo a
national criminal history record information check not less than once
during each five-year period. A child care staff member shall submit a
complete set of his or her fingerprints to the Nebraska State Patrol. The
Nebraska State Patrol shall transmit a copy of the child care staff
member's fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a
national criminal history record information check. The national criminal
history record information check shall include information concerning
child care staff members from federal repositories of such information
and repositories of such information in other states, if authorized by
federal law for use by the Nebraska State Patrol. The Nebraska State
Patrol shall issue a report to the department that includes the
information collected from the national criminal history record
information check concerning child care staff members. The department
shall seek federal funds, if available, to assist child care providers
-5-

LB891 LB891
2026 2026
and child care staff members with the costs of the fingerprinting and
national criminal history record information check. If the department
does not receive sufficient federal funds to assist child care providers
and staff members with such costs, then the child care staff member being
screened, applicant for a license, or licensee shall pay the actual cost
of the fingerprinting and national criminal history record information
check, except that the department may pay all or part of the cost if
funding becomes available. The department and the Nebraska State Patrol
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations concerning the costs
associated with the fingerprinting and the national criminal history
record information check. The department may adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations implementing national criminal history record information
check requirements for child care providers and child care staff members.
(e) A child care staff member shall also submit to the following
background checks at his or her expense not less than once during each
five-year period:
(i) A search of the National Crime Information Center's National Sex
Offender Registry; and
(ii) A search of the following registries, repositories, or
databases in the state where the child care provider is located or where
the child care staff member resides and each state where the child care
provider was located or where the child care staff member resided during
the preceding five years:
(A) State criminal registries or repositories;
(B) State sex offender registries or repositories; and
(C) State-based child abuse and neglect registries and databases.
(f) Documentation of eligibility for employment in child care from a
national criminal history record information check Background checks
shall be portable between child care providers, child care staff members,
prospective child care staff members, staffing agencies, and substitute
child care staff pool operators.
-6-

LB891 LB891
2026 2026
(g) Any individual shall be ineligible for employment by a child
care provider if such individual:
(i) Refuses to consent to the national criminal history record
information check or a background check described in this subsection;
(ii) Knowingly makes a materially false statement in connection with
the national criminal history record information check or a background
check described in this subsection;
(iii) Is registered, or required to be registered, on a state sex
offender registry or repository or the National Sex Offender Registry; or
(iv) Has been convicted of a crime of violence, a crime of moral
turpitude, or a crime of dishonesty.
(h) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
for purposes of this section.
(i) A child care provider shall be ineligible for a license under
the Child Care Licensing Act and shall be ineligible to participate in
the child care subsidy program if the provider employs a child care staff
member who is ineligible for employment under subdivisions (g) or (h) of
this subsection.
(j) National criminal history record information and information
from background checks described in this subsection subject to state or
federal confidentiality requirements may only be used for purposes of
granting a child care license or approving a child care provider for
participation in the child care subsidy program.
(k) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Child care provider means a child care program required to be
licensed under the Child Care Licensing Act; and
(ii) Child care staff member means an individual who is not related
to all of the children for whom child care services are provided and:
(A) Who is employed by a child care provider for compensation,
including contract employees or self-employed individuals;
(B) Whose activities involve the care or supervision of children for
-7-

LB891 LB891
2026 2026
a child care provider or unsupervised access to children who are cared
for or supervised by a child care provider; or
(C) Who is residing in a family child care home and who is eighteen
years of age or older.
Sec. 3. Section 71-1918, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-1918 The department shall maintain a complaint tracking system
which shall identify licensing violations discovered from a complaint
investigation, an unannounced inspection, or a self-report investigation
for licensees under the Child Care Licensing Act.
Sec. 4. (1) No child care program licensed under the Child Care
Licensing Act shall be prohibited from including a volunteer in the
staff-to-child ratio if (a) the volunteer submits to a national criminal
history record information check and all other background checks as
required in section 71-1912, (b) is supervised at all times by an
individual who received a qualifying result on a background check, and
(c) meets staff qualifications if working more than twenty hours per week
in a licensed child care center, school-age-only center, or preschool. No
child care program licensed under the Child Care Licensing Act shall be
prohibited from including a volunteer in the unsupervised staff-to-child
ratio, if the volunteer (a) submits to a national criminal history record
check and all other background checks as required by section 71-1912 and
(b) meets staff qualifications and training requirements.
(2) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to include volunteer staff who provide direct care to children and any
other individual who counts in the staff-to-child ratio in the definition
of staff in all licensed settings under the Child Care Licensing Act.
(3) This section terminates on December 31, 2028.
Sec. 5. No political subdivision shall institute residency
requirements for any family child care home.
Sec. 6. Original section 71-1918, Reissue Revised Statutes of
-8-

LB891 LB891
2026 2026
Nebraska, and sections 71-1908 and 71-1912, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, are repealed.
-9-